Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GUNS DOWN LOVE UP.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to Guns Down Love Up, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to acquire property for a retreat center for victims of gun violence. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end